Massachusetts, session 194th, H4523.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Pursuant to Article 97 of the Amendments to the Constitution of the
Commonwealth of Massachusetts and notwithstanding any provisions of any general or special
law to the contrary, the town of Nantucket acting by and through its Conservation Commission,
is hereby authorized to convey a certain parcel of land situated at 35 Grove Lane, as shown on a
plan of land recorded with the Nantucket County Registry of Deeds in Plan File 8A of land
entitled “Plan of Taking for Nantucket County Commissioners School Street in Nantucket
of 3

(Surfside) MA.,” dated May 26, 1981, prepared by John J. Shugrue, Inc., recorded with
Nantucket County Registry of Deeds in Plan Book 12-C-1, owned by the town of Nantucket
pursuant to a Deed recorded with the Nantucket County Registry of Deeds in Book 164, Page
228, to the town of Nantucket acting by and through its Select Board for purposes of
conveyance.
SECTION 2. Pursuant to Article 97 of the Amendments to the Constitution of the
Commonwealth of Massachusetts and notwithstanding any provisions of any general or special
law to the contrary, the town of Nantucket may transfer, sell, convey or otherwise dispose of all
or portions of certain parcels of land situated in the town of Nantucket to the Nantucket Islands
Land Bank for the purposes pursuant to its enabling legislation and/or to the Sconset Trust, Inc.
for open space, conservation and passive recreation purposes, and described as follows:
• Tax Assessor’s Map 74 as Parcel 71, Low Beach Road (portion of former railroad
bed)
• Unnamed way bounded by the eastern sideline of Low Beach Road to the Atlantic
Ocean and bounded by 2 Low Beach Road, shown on Tax Assessor’s Map 74 as Parcel 74 and 6
Low Beach Road, shown on Tax Assessor’s Map 74 as Parcel 76, Siasconset
• Hawthorne Avenue (between Ocean Avenue and the Atlantic Ocean)
• 35 Grove Lane, shown on Tax Assessor’s Map 71 as Parcel 342
Any such disposition shall be on such terms and conditions as the Select Board deem
appropriate, which may include the reservation of restrictions and easements, all as shown on a
map filed with the Office of the Town Clerk.
of 3

SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 3